South Dakota, session 2026, SB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-26-4 be AMENDED:
1-26-4. The following notice, service, and public hearing procedure must be used
to adopt, amend, or repeal a permanent rule:
(1) An agency shall serve a copy of a proposed rule and any publication described in
§ 1-26-6.6 upon the departmental secretary, bureau commissioner, public utilities
commissioner, or constitutional officer to which it is attached for the secretary's,
commissioner's, or officer's written approval to proceed;
(2) After receiving the written approval of the secretary, commissioner, or officer to
proceed, the agency shall serve code counsel with a copy of: the proposed rule;
any publication described in § 1-26-6.6; the fiscal note required by § 1-26-4.2; the
impact statement on small business required by § 1-26-2.1; any housing cost
impact statement required by § 1-26-2.3; the agency financial resource
information required by § 1-26-4.8; and the notice of hearing required by § 1-26-
4.1. The copy of these documents must be served at least twenty days before the
public hearing to adopt the proposed rule. Any publication described in § 1-26-6.6
must be returned to the agency upon completion of the code counsel's review and
retained by the agency. Twenty days before the public hearing, the agency shall
serve the commissioner of the Bureau of Finance and Management with a copy of:
the proposed rule; the fiscal note required by § 1-26-4.2; the impact statement on
small business required by § 1-26-2.1; any housing cost impact statement required
by § 1-26-2.3; the agency financial resource information required by § 1-26-4.8;
and the notice of hearing required by § 1-26-4.1;
(3) At least twenty days before the public hearing, the agency shall:

26.117.11 2 57
(a) Publish the notice of hearing in the manner prescribed by § 1-26-4.1; and
(b) Publish, on the agency's website, any housing cost impact statement
required by § 1-26-2.3;
(4) After reviewing the proposed rule pursuant to § 1-26-6.5, code counsel shall advise
the agency of any recommended corrections to the proposed rule. If the agency
does not concur with any recommendation of code counsel, the agency may appeal
the recommended correction to the Interim Rules Review Committee for
appropriate action;
(5) The agency shall afford all interested persons reasonable opportunity to submit
amendments, data, opinions, or arguments at a public hearing held to adopt the
rule. The hearing may be continued from time to time. The agency shall keep
minutes of the hearing. A majority of the members of any board or commission
authorized to pass rules must be present during the course of the public hearing;
(6) If the authority promulgating the rule is a secretary, commissioner, or officer, the
agency shall accept written comments regarding the proposed rule for a period of
ten days after the public hearing. If the authority promulgating the rule is a board,
commission, committee, or task force, each interested person must submit written
comments at least seventy-two hours before the public hearing. The seventy-two
hours does not include the day of the public hearing. The written comments may
be submitted by mail or email. The record of written comments may be closed at
the conclusion of the public hearing. The hearing may be continued for the purpose
of taking additional comments;
(7) After the written comment period, the agency shall consider all amendments, data,
opinions, or arguments regarding the proposed rule. A proposed rule may be
modified or amended at this time to include or exclude matters that were described
in the notice of hearing; and
(8) The agency shall serve the minutes of the hearing, a complete record of written
comments, the impact statement on small business, any housing cost impact
statement, the fiscal note, the agency financial resource information required by
§ 1-26-4.8, and a corrected copy of the rule on the members of the Interim Rules
Review Committee and on code counsel at least seven days before the agency
appears before the committee to present the rules.
The time periods specified in this section may be extended by the agency. The
requirement to serve the committee and code counsel within the time limit specified in
subdivision (8) may be waived by the committee chair, if the agency presents sufficient
SB57 ENROLLED

26.117.11 3 57
reasons to the committee chair that the agency is unable to comply with the time limit.
The waiver may not be granted solely for the convenience of the agency.
Section 2. That § 1-26-4.8 be AMENDED:
1-26-4.8. If an agency proposes a rule to increase a fee, the agency shall provide
information to the Interim Rules Review Committee and code counsel, pursuant to § 1-
26-4, about the financial resources available to the agency. This information consists of
the agency's beginning fund balance, receipts, disbursements, and ending fund balance
for each of the last two fiscal years, as well as the agency's beginning fund balance,
projected receipts, projected disbursements, and ending balance for the current fiscal year
and the next fiscal year.
SB57 ENROLLED

26.117.11 4 57
An Act to clarify when agency financial resource information must be filed in the permanent
administrative rulemaking process.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 57
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 57 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB57 ENROLLED